Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-102 Certificate of authority. (a)
When permitted by an applicant captive insurance company's organizational
documents, the applicant captive insurance company may apply to the
commissioner for a certificate of authority to do any and all insurance set
forth in subsection (h); provided that:

(1) No pure captive insurance company may insure or
reinsure any risks other than those of its parent, affiliated entities, and
controlled unaffiliated businesses, which shall be approved on a case by case basis;

(2) No association captive insurance company may
insure any risks other than those of its association, those of the member
organizations of its association, and those of a member organization's
affiliated entities;

(3) Unless otherwise allowed under section
431:19-102.2, no captive insurance company may provide personal motor vehicle
or homeowner's insurance coverage or any component thereof, other than as:

(A) Employee benefits for the employees of a
parent, association, or its members, and their respective affiliated entities;
or

(B) Reinsurance as may be allowed under this
article; and

(4) No captive insurance company may accept or cede
insurance except as provided in section 431:19-111.

(b) No captive insurance company shall do any
insurance business in this State unless:

(1) It first obtains from the commissioner a
certificate of authority authorizing it to do insurance business in this State;

(2) Its governing body holds at least one meeting
each year in this State;

(3) It maintains its principal place of business and
registered office in this State, except that a branch captive insurance company
need only maintain the principal place of a business unit in this State; and

(4) It designates a registered resident agent in
accordance with chapter 414, 414D, or 428, as applicable, to accept service of
process and to otherwise act on its behalf in this State. Whenever the
registered resident agent cannot, with reasonable diligence, be found at the
registered office of the captive insurance company, the commissioner shall be
an agent of the captive insurance company upon whom any process, notice, or
demand may be served in accordance with section 431:2-206.

(c) Before an applicant captive insurance
company receives a certificate of authority, the applicant captive insurance
company shall file with the commissioner:

(1) A certified copy of its organizational documents;

(2) A statement under oath of:

(A) Any two of its principal officers;

(B) Its attorney-in-fact in the case of a
captive insurance company formed as a reciprocal insurer; or

(C) The duly authorized representative of its
governing body,

showing its financial condition; and

(3) Any other statements or documents required by the
commissioner.

(d) In addition to the information required by
subsection (c), each applicant captive insurance company shall file with the
commissioner evidence of the following:

(1) The amount and liquidity of its assets relative
to the risks to be assumed;

(2) The adequacy of the expertise, experience, and
character of the person or persons who will manage it;

(3) The overall soundness of its plan of operation,
including the net retained risk on any one subject of insurance;

(4) The adequacy of the loss prevention programs of
its parent or member organizations as applicable; and

(5) Any other factors deemed relevant by the
commissioner in ascertaining whether the proposed captive insurance company
will be able to meet its policy obligations.

(e) Each applicant captive insurance company
shall pay to the commissioner a nonrefundable application fee for examining,
investigating, and processing its application for the certificate of
authority. Upon approval of the application for the certificate of authority,
the applicant captive insurance company shall pay to the commissioner a license
fee for the certificate of authority. Thereafter, the captive insurance
company shall pay to the commissioner an annual renewal fee. The amount of the
nonrefundable application fee, license fee, and renewal fee shall be set forth
in rules adopted by the commissioner. In addition, the commissioner may
adopt rules with respect to fees for the issuance of other documents as may be
deemed necessary or requested by captive insurance companies.

(f) The commissioner may use independent
advisors and consultants to assist in the review and analysis of a specific
application or business plan amendment. The independent advisory and
consulting fee, to be paid by the applicant captive insurance company, shall be
a reasonable fee authorized by the commissioner pursuant to section 431:19-114.

(g) If the commissioner is satisfied that the
documents and statements filed by the captive insurance company comply with
this article, the commissioner may issue a certificate of authority authorizing
it to do insurance business in this State until April 1 thereafter, which
certificate of authority may be renewed.

(h) A captive insurance company may engage in
the business of any of the following types of insurance:

(1) All casualty insurance;

(2) Marine and transportation insurance;

(3) Marine protection and indemnity insurance, which
includes insurance against, or against legal liability of the insured for loss,
damage, or expense arising out of or incident to, the ownership, operation,
chartering, maintenance, use, repair, or construction of a vessel, craft, or
instrumentality in use in ocean or inland waterways, including liability of the
insured for personal injury, illness, death, or for loss of or damage to the
property of another person;

(4) Wet marine and transportation insurance, which is
that part of marine and transportation insurance that includes only:

(A) Insurance upon vessels, crafts, hulls, and
of interests therein or with relation thereto;

(B) Insurance of marine builder's risks,
marine war risks and contracts, or marine protection and indemnity insurance;

(C) Insurance of freights and disbursements
pertaining to a subject of insurance; and

(D) Insurance of personal property and
interests therein, in the course of exportation from or importation into any
country, and in the course of transportation coastwise or on inland waters,
including transportation by land, water, or air from point of origin to final
destination, with respect to, appertaining to, or in connection with any and
all risks or perils of navigation, transit, or transportation, and while being
prepared for and while awaiting shipment, and during delays, storage,
transshipment, or reshipment incident thereto;

(5) Property insurance;

(6) Surety insurance;

(7) Title insurance;

(8) Credit life insurance and credit disability
insurance offered as part of, or relating directly to the business or
operations of its parent or affiliated entities; and

(9) Other lines of insurance that the commissioner
may allow.

(i) No risk retention captive insurance
company may insure any risks other than those allowed under chapter 431K. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1988, c 187, §9; am L 1989, c 195, §40; am L 1990,
c 254, §1; am L 1997, c 16, §2; am L 1998, c 150, §3; am L 1999, c 174, §1; am
L 2000, c 133, §2; am L 2003, c 209, §2; am L 2004, c 122, §77; am L 2005, c
31, §3; am L 2007, c 232, §3; am L 2012, c 253, §6]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next